Hawaii statutes.
§832-4 Governor may investigate case.
When a demand is made upon the governor by the executive authority of any state
for the surrender of a person so charged with crime, the governor may call upon
the attorney general or any other prosecuting officer in this State to
investigate or assist in investigating the demand, and to report to the
governor the situation and circumstances of the person so demanded, and whether
the person ought to be surrendered. [L 1941, c 99, §4; RL 1945, §10634; RL
1955, §250-4; HRS §713-4; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next